Nevada, session 83, AB245.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. Chapter 202 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
1. A person who is less than 21 years of age shall not handle
or have in his or her possession or under his or her control any:
(a) Semiautomatic shotgun; or
(b) Semiautomatic centerfire rifle.
 A person who violates this subsection is guilty of a gross
misdemeanor.
2. Unless a greater penalty is provided by law, a person who
aids or knowingly permits a person who is less than 21 years of
age to violate subsection 1:
(a) Except as otherwise provided in paragraph (b), for the first
offense, is guilty of a misdemeanor.
(b) For a first offense, if the person knows or has reason to
know that there is a substantial risk that the person who is less
than 21 years of age will use the firearm to commit a violent act, is
guilty of a category C felony and shall be punished as provided in
NRS 193.130.
(c) For a second or any subsequent offense, is guilty of a
category B felony and shall be punished by imprisonment in the
state prison for a minimum term of not less than 1 year and a
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 3 –
maximum term of not more than 6 years, and may be further
punished by a fine of not more than $5,000.
3. A person does not aid or knowingly permit a person who is
less than 21 years of age to violate subsection 1 if:
(a) The firearm was stored in a securely locked container or at
a location which a reasonable person would have believed to be
secure;
(b) The person who is less than 21 years of age obtained the
firearm as a result of an unlawful entry by any person in or upon
the premises where the firearm was stored;
(c) The injury or death resulted from an accident which was
incident to target shooting, sport shooting or hunting; or
(d) The person who is less than 21 years of age gained
possession of the firearm from a member of the Armed Forces of
the United States, a reserve component thereof or the National
Guard or a law enforcement officer while the member or law
enforcement officer was carrying out official duties.
4. The provisions of subsection 1 do not apply to a person
who is less than 21 years of age and who:
(a) Is a member of the Armed Forces of the United States, a
reserve component thereof or the National Guard;
(b) Was discharged or released from service in the Armed
Forces of the United States, a reserve component thereof or the
National Guard under honorable conditions;
(c) Is a law enforcement officer who is employed by a federal,
state or local law enforcement agency; or
(d) Is at least 18 years of age and who temporarily handles or
possesses a semiautomatic shotgun or semiautomatic centerfire
rifle exclusively:
(1) At an established shooting range authorized by the
governing body of the jurisdiction in which such a range is
located;
(2) At a lawful organized competition involving the use of a
firearm;
(3) While participating in or practicing for a public
performance by an organized group that uses firearms as a part of
the public performance; or
(4) While hunting or trapping, if such activity is lawful in
all locations where the person possesses the firearm and the
person holds all licenses or permits required for such hunting or
trapping; or
(e) Is at least 18 years of age and handles or possesses a
semiautomatic shotgun or semiautomatic centerfire rifle while
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 4 –
engaged in lawful predatory animal or range control activities on
rangeland.
5. Unless a greater penalty is provided by law, a person is
guilty of a misdemeanor who:
(a) Negligently stores or leaves a firearm at a location under
his or her control; and
(b) Knows or has reason to know that there is a substantial
risk that a person who is less than 21 years of age and who is
prohibited from handling or having in his or her possession or
under his or her control any firearm pursuant to this section may
obtain such a firearm.
Sec. 2. NRS 202.253 is hereby amended to read as follows:
202.253 As used in NRS 202.253 to 202.369, inclusive [:] ,
and section 1 of this act:
1. “Antique firearm” has the meaning ascribed to it in 18
U.S.C. § 921(a)(16).
2. “Explosive or incendiary device” means any explosive or
incendiary material or substance that has been constructed, altered,
packaged or arranged in such a manner that its ordinary use would
cause destruction or injury to life or property.
3. “Firearm” means any device designed to be used as a
weapon from which a projectile may be expelled through the barrel
by the force of any explosion or other form of combustion.
4. “Firearm capable of being concealed upon the person”
applies to and includes all firearms having a barrel less than 12
inches in length.
5. “Firearms importer or manufacturer” means a person
licensed to import or manufacture firearms pursuant to 18 U.S.C.
Chapter 44.
6. “Machine gun” means any weapon which shoots, is
designed to shoot or can be readily restored to shoot more than one
shot, without manual reloading, by a single function of the trigger.
7. “Motor vehicle” means every vehicle that is self-propelled.
8. “Semiautomatic firearm” means any firearm that:
(a) Uses a portion of the energy of a firing cartridge to extract
the fired cartridge case and chamber the next shell or round;
(b) Requires a separate function of the trigger to fire each
cartridge; and
(c) Is not a machine gun.
9. “Unfinished frame or receiver” means a blank, a casting or a
machined body that is intended to be turned into the frame or lower
receiver of a firearm with additional machining and which has been
formed or machined to the point at which most of the major
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 5 –
machining operations have been completed to turn the blank, casting
or machined body into a frame or lower receiver of a firearm even if
the fire-control cavity area of the blank, casting or machined body is
still completely solid and unmachined.
Sec. 3. NRS 202.300 is hereby amended to read as follows:
202.300 1. Except as otherwise provided in this section, a
child under the age of 18 years shall not handle or have in his or her
possession or under his or her control, except while accompanied by
or under the immediate charge of his or her parent or guardian or an
adult person authorized by his or her parent or guardian to have
control or custody of the child, any firearm of any kind for hunting
or target practice or for other purposes. A child who violates this
subsection commits a delinquent act and the court may order the
detention of the child in the same manner as if the child had
committed an act that would have been a felony if committed by an
adult.
2. A person who aids or knowingly permits a child to violate
subsection 1:
(a) Except as otherwise provided in paragraph (b), for the first
offense, is guilty of a misdemeanor.
(b) For a first offense, if the person knows or has reason to know
that there is a substantial risk that the child will use the firearm to
commit a violent act, is guilty of a category C felony and shall be
punished as provided in NRS 193.130.
(c) For a second or any subsequent offense, is guilty of a
category B felony and shall be punished by imprisonment in the
state prison for a minimum term of not less than 1 year and a
maximum term of not more than 6 years, and may be further
punished by a fine of not more than $5,000.
3. A person does not aid or knowingly permit a child to violate
subsection 1 if:
(a) The firearm was stored in a securely locked container or at a
location which a reasonable person would have believed to be
secure;
(b) The child obtained the firearm as a result of an unlawful
entry by any person in or upon the premises where the firearm was
stored;
(c) The injury or death resulted from an accident which was
incident to target shooting, sport shooting or hunting; or
(d) The child gained possession of the firearm from a member of
the military or a law enforcement officer, while the member or
officer was performing his or her official duties.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 6 –
4. The provisions of subsection 1 do not apply to a child who is
a member of the Armed Forces of the United States.
5. Unless a greater penalty is provided by law, a person is
guilty of a misdemeanor who:
(a) Negligently stores or leaves a firearm at a location under his
or her control; and
(b) Knows or has reason to know that there is a substantial risk
that a child prohibited from handling or having in his or her
possession or under his or her control any firearm pursuant to this
section may obtain such a firearm.
6. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 9, a child who is
14 years of age or older, who has in his or her possession a valid
license to hunt, may handle or have in his or her possession or under
his or her control, without being accompanied by his or her parent or
guardian or an adult person authorized by his or her parent or
guardian to have control or custody of the child:
(a) A rifle or shotgun that is not a semiautomatic shotgun,
semiautomatic centerfire rifle or fully automatic firearm, if the
child is not otherwise prohibited by law from possessing the rifle or
shotgun and the child has the permission of his or her parent
or guardian to handle or have in his or her possession or under his or
her control the rifle or shotgun; or
(b) A firearm capable of being concealed upon the person, if the
child has the written permission of his or her parent or guardian to
handle or have in his or her possession or under his or her control
such a firearm and the child is not otherwise prohibited by law from
possessing such a firearm,
 and the child is traveling to the area in which the child will be
hunting or returning from that area and the firearm is not loaded, or
the child is hunting pursuant to that license.
7. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 9, a child who is
14 years of age or older may handle or have in his or her possession
or under his or her control a rifle or shotgun that is not a
semiautomatic shotgun, semiautomatic centerfire rifle or fully
automatic firearm if the child is not otherwise prohibited by law
from possessing the rifle or shotgun, without being accompanied by
his or her parent or guardian or an adult person authorized by his or
her parent or guardian to have control or custody of the child, if the
child has the permission of his or her parent or guardian to handle or
have in his or her possession or under his or her control the rifle or
shotgun and the child is:
(a) Attending a course of instruction in the responsibilities of
hunters or a course of instruction in the safe use of firearms;
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 7 –
(b) Practicing the use of a firearm at an established firing range
or at any other area where the discharge of a firearm is permitted;
(c) Participating in a lawfully organized competition or
performance involving the use of a firearm;
(d) Within an area in which the discharge of firearms has not
been prohibited by local ordinance or regulation and the child is
engaging in a lawful hunting activity in accordance with chapter 502
of NRS for which a license is not required;
(e) Traveling to or from any activity described in paragraph (a),
(b), (c) or (d), and the firearm is not loaded;
(f) On real property that is under the control of an adult, and the
child has the permission of that adult to possess the firearm on the
real property; or
(g) At his or her residence [.] , so long as the rifle or shotgun,
when not in use, is unloaded and stored in a securely locked
container under the possession of his or her parent or guardian or
an adult person authorized by his or her parent or guardian to
have control or custody of the child.
8. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 9, a child who is
14 years of age or older may handle or have in his or her possession
or under his or her control, for the purpose of engaging in any of the
activities listed in paragraphs (a) to (g), inclusive, of subsection 7, a
firearm capable of being concealed upon the person, without being
accompanied by his or her parent or guardian or an adult person
authorized by his or her parent or guardian to have control or
custody of the child, if the child:
(a) Has the written permission of his or her parent or guardian to
handle or have in his or her possession or under his or her control
such a firearm for the purpose of engaging in such an activity; and
(b) Is not otherwise prohibited by law from possessing such a
firearm.
9. A child shall not handle or have in his or her possession or
under his or her control a loaded firearm if the child is:
(a) An occupant of a motor vehicle;
(b) Within any residence, including his or her residence, or any
building other than a facility licensed for target practice, unless
possession of the firearm is necessary for the immediate defense of
the child or another person; or
(c) Within an area designated by a county or municipal
ordinance as a populated area for the purpose of prohibiting the
discharge of weapons, unless the child is within a facility licensed
for target practice.
10. For the purposes of this section, a firearm is loaded if:
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 8 –
(a) There is a cartridge in the chamber of the firearm;
(b) There is a cartridge in the cylinder of the firearm, if the
firearm is a revolver; or
(c) There is a cartridge in the magazine and the magazine is in
the firearm or there is a cartridge in the chamber, if the firearm is a
semiautomatic firearm.
Sec. 3.5. NRS 202.310 is hereby amended to read as follows:
202.310 1. Any person in this State who sells or barters to a
child who is under the age of 18 years, with reckless disregard of
whether the child is under the age of 18 years, or with knowledge or
reason to know that the child is under the age of 18 years, a pistol,
revolver or a firearm capable of being concealed upon the person is
guilty of a category B felony and shall be punished by imprisonment
in the state prison for a minimum term of not less than 1 year and a
maximum term of not more than 6 years, and may be further
punished by a fine of not more than $5,000.
2. Any person in this State who sells or barters a
semiautomatic centerfire rifle or semiautomatic shotgun to a
person who is less than 21 years of age, with reckless disregard of
the age of the person or with knowledge or reason to know that the
person is less than 21 years of age, is guilty of a category B felony
and shall be punished by imprisonment in the state prison for a
minimum term of not less than 1 year and a maximum term of not
more than 6 years, and may be further punished by a fine of not
more than $5,000.
Sec. 4. This act becomes effective on July 1, 2025.
20 ~~~~~ 25
-
83rd Session (2025)